Utah statutes.
78B-6-805.   Notice to quit -- How served.
(1)  The notices required by this part may be served:
(a)  by delivering a copy to the tenant personally or, if the tenant is a
commercial tenant, by delivering a copy to the commercial tenant's usual place
of business by leaving a copy of the notice with a person of suitable age and
discretion;
(b)  by sending a copy through registered or certified mail addressed to the
tenant at the tenant's residence or, if the tenant is a commercial tenant, by
sending a copy through registered or certified mail addressed to the
commercial tenant's usual place of business;
(c)  if the tenant is absent from the residence or usual place of business, by
leaving a copy with a person of suitable age and discretion at either place
and mailing a copy to the tenant at the tenant's residence or place of
business;
(d)  if a person of suitable age or discretion cannot be found at the place of
residence, then by affixing a copy in a conspicuous place on the leased
property; or
(e)  if an order of abatement by eviction of the nuisance is issued by the
court as provided in Section 78B-6-1109, when issued, the parties present
shall be on notice that the abatement by eviction order is issued and
immediately effective or as to any absent party, notice shall be given as
provided in Subsections (1)(a) through (e).
(2)  Service upon a subtenant may be made in the same manner as provided in
Subsection (1).
